Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5839.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. The legislature declares that the second new moon after the winter solstice or the third new moon after the winter solstice if an intercalary month intervenes, according to the Chinese calendar, shall be known as "Lunar New Year", a holiday celebrated by Michiganders of Chinese, Korean, Taiwanese, Vietnamese, and other East or Southeast Asian origins.